Missouri, session 2026, HB3494.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.017, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 115.017, to read as follows:
115.017. There shall be a board of election commissioners:
(1) In each county which has or hereafter has over nine hundred thousand inhabitants;
(2) In each city not situated in a county;
(3) [In each city which has over three hundred thousand inhabitants on January 1,
1978, and is situated in more than one county;
(4)] In each county of the first classification containing any part of a city which has
over three hundred thousand inhabitants; provided that the county commission of a county
which becomes a county of the first classification after December 31, 1998, may, prior to such
date, adopt an order retaining the county clerk as the election authority. The county may
subsequently establish a board of election commissioners as provided in subdivision (5) of
this section;
[(5)] (4) In each county of the first class which elects to have such a board through
procedures provided in section 115.019.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.